Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB103.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 151B.195 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The executive director of the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation:
(a) Shall promulgate[prescribe] administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
governing the services, personnel, and administration of vocational rehabilitation services for
Kentucky;
(b) Shall establish a preference for in-state services, so long as the preference does not effectively deny
an individual a necessary service that may be available outside of Kentucky;[the State Vocational
Rehabilitation Agency;]
(c) May enter into reciprocal agreements with other states to provide for the vocational rehabilitation of
residents of the states concerned;
(d) May establish and supervise the operation of small businesses established pursuant to KRS 151B.180 to
151B.210 to be conducted by eligible individuals with severe disabilities; and
(e) May establish state funded special programs for vocational rehabilitation in the state vocational
rehabilitation agency.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 151B.190, the executive director shall promulgate[may prescribe] administrative
regulations to establish procedures and standards for service fee memoranda and fees for services provided
to individuals or entities, public or private, including but not limited to community rehabilitation program
service providers. Any revised procedure or standard for service fee memoranda shall be established prior to
the new fiscal year.
(3) The executive director is authorized to provide liability insurance or an indemnity bond against the negligence
of drivers of motor vehicles owned or operated by the office for the transportation of applicants or clients of
the office. If the transportation is let out under contract, the contract shall require the contractor to carry an
indemnity bond or liability insurance against negligence to such amounts as the executive director designates.
In either case, the indemnity bond or insurance policy shall be issued by a surety or insurance company
authorized to transact business in this state, and shall bind the company to pay any final judgment not to
exceed the limits of the policy rendered against the insured for loss or damage to property of any applicant or
client or other person, or death or injury of any applicant or client or other person.
(4) The provisions of any other statute notwithstanding, the executive director is authorized to use receipt of funds
from the Social Security reimbursement program for a direct service delivery staff incentive program.
Incentives may be awarded if case service costs are reimbursed for job placement of Social Security or
Supplemental Security Income recipients at the Substantial Gainful Activity (SGA) level for nine (9) months
pursuant to 42 U.S.C. sec. 422 and under those conditions and criteria as are established by the federal
reimbursement program.
(5) The executive director shall submit an annual report of its activities for the preceding fiscal year to the
Governor and the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Families
and Children and the Interim Joint Committee on Economic Development and Workforce Investment.
Each report shall include a complete operating and financial statement of the Office of Vocational
Rehabilitation.
Signed by Governor March 19, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version